Massachusetts, session 194th, H4039.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 19A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 45. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Center for active living”, “senior center” or “council on aging”, a community-based
organization that provides services for elder adults and people with a disability.
(b) The department shall provide universal breakfast and lunch at senior centers, centers
for active living and councils on aging in the commonwealth. A senior center, center for active
living and council on aging living shall have a kitchen in order to participate in the department’s
universal breakfast and lunch program.
of 3

(c) Universal breakfast and lunch at senior centers, centers for active living and councils
on aging in the commonwealth shall be funded by Senior Breakfast and Lunch Fund established
by section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29.
SECTION 2. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
section 2JJJJJJ, the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) For the purposes of section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Center for active living”, “senior center” or “council on aging”, a community-based
organization that provides services for elder adults and people with a disability.
“Department”, the department of aging and independence established in section 1 of
chapter 19A.
“Secretary”, the secretary of the department of aging and independence established in
section 1 of chapter 19A.
(b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund known as the Senior Breakfast and Lunch Fund, hereinafter referred to as the fund. The
purpose of the fund shall be to establish and support universal breakfast and lunch at senior
centers, centers for active living and councils on aging in the commonwealth pursuant to section
45 of chapter 19A. The fund shall be administered by the secretary.
(c) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund;
of 3

(ii) interest earned on money in the fund; (iii) contributions from private sector entities,
including nonprofits, foundations and other organizations; (iv) federal grants and other gifts,
grants and donations for the establishment and support of seniors; and (v) a minimum of 1 per
cent of the annual revenue collected from the sales tax on articles of clothing and footwear over
$175 pursuant to subsection (k) of section 6 of chapter 64H. Amounts credited to the fund shall
not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal
year shall not revert to the General Fund.
(d) The secretary shall make expenditures from the fund including, but not limited to, the
following purposes: (i) creating universal breakfast and lunch programs at senior centers, centers
for active living and councils on aging; (ii) prioritizing and improving kitchens located at senior
centers, centers for active living and councils on aging participating in the universal breakfast
and lunch program; (iii) partnering with other breakfast and lunch programs already operating in
the commonwealth; and (iv) providing resources to senior centers, centers for active living and
councils on aging to best provide universal breakfast and lunch.
(e) The department shall annually, not later than December 31, report on the activity of
the fund to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on aging and independence; (ii) chairs of the
joint committee on municipalities and regional government; (iii) chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means; and (iv) clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
of 3